Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.350

Duties of department of licensing, secretary of state.

The department of licensing shall produce and transmit to the secretary of state the following information from the records of each individual who requested to register to vote or update the individual's existing voter registration at a driver's license facility: The name, address, date of birth, any gender information provided by the applicant, the driver's license number, signature image, any language preference information collected, any phone number provided by the voter, any email address provided by the voter, and the date on which the application for voter registration or update was submitted. The secretary of state shall process the registrations and updates as an electronic application. If requested by the secretary of state, the department shall provide copies of the documents submitted to prove citizenship for an individual subject to this section.

[ 2023 c 466 s 13; 2018 c 110 s 106; 2013 c 11 s 18; 2009 c 369 s 21; 2004 c 267 s 120; 2003 c 111 s 226; 1994 c 57 s 22; 1990 c 143 s 2. Formerly RCW 29.07.270.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 466 ss 3, 4, 6, 11, 13-16, and 20-23: See note following RCW 29A.08.030.

Effective date—2018 c 110 ss 101-107: See note following RCW 29A.08.355.

Short title—Findings—Intent—2018 c 110: See notes following RCW 29A.08.355.

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.

Effective date—1990 c 143 ss 1-8: See note following RCW 29A.08.340.